New York, session 2025-2026, S4740.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 20-468 of the administrative code of the city of 2 New York is amended by adding a new subdivision g to read as follows: 3 g. (1) If perishable or canned foods are seized from a general vendor, 4 such items shall be taken to the nearest food relief organization and/or 5 homeless shelter. Perishable and canned foods shall not be discarded. 6 (2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms shall have 7 the following meanings: 8 (i) "perishable foods" are any food that may spoil or otherwise become 9 unfit for human consumption because of its nature, type or physical 10 condition. Perishable food shall include, but is not limited to, fresh 11 or processed meats, poultry, seafood, dairy products, bakery products, 12 eggs in the shell, fresh fruits or vegetables and foods that have been 13 packaged, refrigerated or frozen, or otherwise require refrigeration to 14 remain nonperishable. Perishable food shall not include game or wild 15 game; 16 (ii) "canned foods" are any food that has been hermetically sealed in 17 a can and commercially processed and prepared for human consumption, 18 including preserved fruits, vegetables, or other food items; and 19 (iii) "food relief organization" means a religious organization or 20 other not-for-profit that provides food for free to persons experiencing 21 food insecurity, including but not limited to a food pantry, food bank, 22 or soup kitchen or community-based organization that provides food for 23 free to persons experiencing food insecurity. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09462-01-5